Vermont, session 2025-2026, H372.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 6 V.S.A. § 1101 is amended to read:
§ 1101. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) “Secretary” has the same meaning stated in subdivision 911(4) of
this title.
* * *
(4) “Economic poison” has the same meaning stated in subdivision
911(5) of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #379830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.372
2025 Page 2 of 4
(6) “Pesticide” for the purposes of this chapter is used interchangeably
with “economic poison.”
* * *
(8) “Neonicotinoid pesticide” means any economic poison containing a
chemical belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals.
* * *
(15) “Ornamental plants” mean perennials, annuals, and groundcover
purposefully planted for aesthetic reasons.
(16) “Nursery starts” are young plants that have been grown in a nursery
and are ready to be transplanted. “Nursery starts” may be known as seedlings
or starter plants.
(17) “Potted plant” means any herbaceous, horticultural, or ornamental
plant sold in a container that is less than a gallon in size and that is not a
nursery start.
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 1105c is amended to read:
§ 1105c. NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDES; PROHIBITED USES
(a) The following uses of neonicotinoid pesticides are prohibited:
(1) the outdoor application of neonicotinoid pesticides to any crop
during bloom;
VT LEG #379830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.372
2025 Page 3 of 4
(2) the outdoor application of neonicotinoid pesticides to soybeans or
any crop in the cereal grains crop group (crop groups 15, 15-22, 16, and 16-
22);
(3) the outdoor application of neonicotinoid pesticides to crops in the
leafy vegetables; brassica; bulb vegetables; herbs and spices; and stalk, stem,
and leaf petiole vegetables crop groups (crop groups 3, 3-07, 4, 4-16, 5, 5-16,
19, 22, 25, and 26) harvested after bloom; and
(4) the application of neonicotinoid pesticides to ornamental plants; and
(5) the application of neonicotinoid pesticides to nursery starts or potted
plants.
(b) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, after consultation with
the Secretary of Natural Resources, may issue a written exemption order to
suspend the provisions of subsection (a) of this section if the Secretary
determines that:
(1) a valid environmental emergency or agricultural emergency exists;
(2) the pesticide would be effective in addressing the environmental
emergency or the agricultural emergency; and
(3) no other, less harmful pesticide or pest management practice would
be effective in addressing the environmental emergency or the agricultural
emergency.
VT LEG #379830 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.372
2025 Page 4 of 4
(c) A written exemption order issued under subsection (b) of this section
shall:
(1) not be valid for more than one year;
(2) specify the neonicotinoid pesticides, uses, and crops, or plants to
which the exemption order applies; the date on which the exemption order
takes effect; the exemption order’s duration; and the exemption order’s
geographic scope, which may include specific farms, fields, or properties; and
(3) provide a detailed evaluation determining that an agricultural
emergency or an environmental emergency exists.
(d) A written exemption order issued under subsection (b) of this section
may:
(1) establish restrictions related to the use of neonicotinoid pesticides to
which the exemption order applies to minimize harm to pollinator populations,
bird populations, ecosystem health, and public health; or
(2) establish other restrictions related to the use of neonicotinoid
pesticides to which the exemption order applies that the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets considers necessary.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379830 v.1